Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.6905, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 39. new text end new text begin Transit obstruction camera data. new text end new text begin Data related to transit obstruction cameras are governed by section 169.355, subdivisions 11 to 13. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.824, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Automated license plate reader" means an electronic device mounted on a law enforcement vehicle or positioned in a stationary location that is capable of recording data on, or taking a photograph of, a vehicle or its license plate and comparing the collected data and photographs to existing law enforcement databases for investigative purposes. Automated license plate reader includes a device that is owned or operated by a person who is not a government entity to the extent that data collected by the reader are shared with a law enforcement agency. Automated license plate reader does not include anew text begin transit obstruction camera system or anew text end traffic safety camera system. (c) "Traffic safety camera system" has the meaning given in section 169.011, subdivision 85a. new text begin (d) "Transit obstruction camera system" has the meaning given in section 169.011, subdivision 87a. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.824, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Limitations; certain camera systems. A person must not use anew text begin transit obstruction camera system or anew text end traffic safety camera system for purposes of this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 87a. new text end new text begin Transit obstruction camera system. new text end new text begin "Transit obstruction camera system" means an electronic system of one or more cameras or other motor vehicle sensors that is specifically designed to automatically produce recorded images of a motor vehicle stopped or parked in violation of a law or conforming ordinance that regulates motor vehicle stopping or parking, including related information technology for recorded image storage, retrieval, and transmission. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.04, is amended to read: 169.04 LOCAL AUTHORITY. (a) The provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to prevent local authorities, with respect to streets and highways under their jurisdiction, and with the consent of the commissioner, with respect to state trunk highways, within the corporate limits of a municipality, or within the limits of a town in a county in this state now having or which may hereafter have, a population of 500,000 or more, and a land area of not more than 600 square miles, and within the reasonable exercise of the police power from: (1) regulating the standing or parking of vehiclesnew text begin , including through the use of a transit obstruction camera system implemented under section 169.355new text end ; (2) regulating traffic by means of police officers or traffic-control signals; (3) regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblages on the highways; (4) designating particular highways as one-way roadways and requiring that all vehicles, except emergency vehicles, when on an emergency run, thereon be moved in one specific direction; (5) designating any highway as a through highway and requiring that all vehicles stop before entering or crossing the same, or designating any intersection as a stop intersection, and requiring all vehicles to stop at one or more entrances to such intersections; (6) restricting the use of highways as authorized in sections 169.80 to 169.88; (7) regulating speed limits through the use of a speed safety camera system implemented under section 169.147; and (8) regulating traffic control through the use of a red light camera system implemented under section 169.147. (b) No ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraph (a), clause (4), (5), or (6), shall be effective until signs giving notice of such local traffic regulations are posted upon and kept posted upon or at the entrance to the highway or part thereof affected as may be most appropriate. (c) No ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraph (a), clause (3), or any other provision of law shall prohibit: (1) the use of motorcycles or vehicles utilizing flashing red lights for the purpose of escorting funeral processions, oversize buildings, heavy equipment, parades or similar processions or assemblages on the highways; or (2) the use of motorcycles or vehicles that are owned by the funeral home and that utilize flashing red lights for the purpose of escorting funeral processions. (d) Ordinances or regulations enacted under paragraph (a), clauses (7) and (8), are effective after August 1, 2025, and before August 1, 2029. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [169.355] TRANSIT OBSTRUCTION CAMERA SYSTEM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Public transportation" has the meaning given in section 174.22, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (c) "Transit operator" means any entity that is engaged in public transportation, including but not limited to the Metropolitan Council, a replacement service provider under section 473.388, and an entity that is eligible for assistance under the public transportation participation program under section 174.24. new text end new text begin (d) "Transit vehicle" means a motor vehicle used in public transportation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authority; implementation. new text end new text begin (a) A transit operator may equip a transit vehicle with a transit obstruction camera system as provided in this section. new text end new text begin (b) To implement use of a transit obstruction camera system, a transit operator must: new text end new text begin (1) coordinate with the appropriate local units of government on implementation and enforcement, including but not limited to procedures for a transit operator to report a potential violation under subdivision 6 and disseminate data from a transit obstruction camera system; new text end new text begin (2) notify the commissioners of transportation and public safety; and new text end new text begin (3) ensure compliance with the requirements under this section, including but not limited to the standards under subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Transit obstruction camera system requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A transit obstruction camera system may be used to perform automated detection and record video or images to identify a potential violation under subdivision 6 for review. new text end new text begin (b) By December 15, 2026, the commissioner, in coordination with the commissioner of public safety, must establish transit obstruction camera system standards that include: new text end new text begin (1) a requirement that each camera must be mounted facing forward in a manner that is primarily designed to identify a potential violation under subdivision 6; and new text end new text begin (2) recording and data requirements as specified in subdivision 12. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Public information and notice. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner and a transit operator under this section must maintain information on their respective websites that, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) summarizes implementation of transit obstruction camera systems; new text end new text begin (2) identifies transit routes on which transit obstruction camera systems are used; and new text end new text begin (3) provides information and procedures for a person to contest a citation issued under this section. new text end new text begin (b) A transit operator must implement a general public engagement and information campaign before using transit obstruction camera systems under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Parking enforcement agents. new text end new text begin (a) A local unit of government that coordinates with a transit provider to implement camera-based parking enforcement under this section must designate at least one parking enforcement agent. new text end new text begin (b) A parking enforcement agent who is not a licensed peace officer has the authority to issue citations under this section only while engaged in job duties and otherwise has none of the other powers and privileges reserved for peace officers. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Violations; penalty. new text end new text begin Subject to subdivision 7, the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle is guilty of a petty misdemeanor if: new text end new text begin (1) the motor vehicle is stopped, standing, or parked in violation of a law or conforming ordinance that regulates motor vehicle stopping or parking; new text end new text begin (2) the violation is in: new text end new text begin (i) a bus stop zone as indicated by a traffic-control device; new text end new text begin (ii) a vehicle lane during a period in which motor vehicle operation is reserved for transit buses, regardless of whether the lane is available for use by other vehicles in specified circumstances; or new text end new text begin (iii) a bicycle lane; new text end new text begin (3) the violation under clause (2), item (i) or (ii), is committed during scheduled operating hours of transit service at or along that location; and new text end new text begin (4) the violation is identified through the use of a transit obstruction camera system implemented under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Violations; limitations. new text end new text begin (a) An owner or lessee of a motor vehicle is not subject to a fine or conviction under subdivision 6 if: new text end new text begin (1) any of the conditions under section 169.14, subdivision 14, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5), are met; new text end new text begin (2) the vehicle is stopped or parked as provided in section 169.342; or new text end new text begin (3) the vehicle owner provides a sworn statement to the court or prosecuting authority that the violation occurred during the circumstances of a medical emergency for either the driver or a passenger in the vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may not be issued citations under both subdivision 6 and another section or ordinance for the same conduct. new text end new text begin (c) A fine or conviction under subdivision 6 does not constitute grounds for revocation or suspension of a person's driver's license. new text end new text begin (d) A vehicle owner asserting a defense under paragraph (a), clause (3), must provide an accompanying sworn statement from the physician responsible for treatment of the underlying condition or emergency that necessitated medical attention. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Citations; warnings. new text end new text begin (a) A parking enforcement agent has the exclusive authority to issue a citation to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle for a violation under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (b) A parking enforcement agent may only issue a citation if: new text end new text begin (1) the violation is committed at least 60 days after the relevant transit operator has started using transit obstruction camera systems; and new text end new text begin (2) the agent has inspected and verified recorded images provided by the transit obstruction camera system. new text end new text begin (c) A parking enforcement agent must provide a warning for a violation under subdivision 6 committed before the date when citations are authorized under paragraph (b), clause (1). new text end new text begin (d) A citation may be issued through the United States mail if postmarked within: (1) 30 days of the violation for a vehicle registered in Minnesota; or (2) 60 days of the violation for a vehicle registered outside of Minnesota. Section 168.346, subdivision 2, applies to a private entity that provides citation mailing services under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Uniform citation. new text end new text begin (a) There must be a uniform transit obstruction camera citation issued throughout the state for a violation as provided under this section. The uniform transit obstruction camera citation is in the form and has the effect of a summons and complaint. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety must prescribe the detailed form of the uniform transit obstruction camera citation. As appropriate, the citation design must conform with the requirements for a uniform traffic ticket under section 169.99, subdivisions 1 and 1d. The citation design must include: new text end new text begin (1) a brief overview of transit obstruction camera systems and implementation under this section; new text end new text begin (2) a summary of the circumstances of the citation that includes identification of the motor vehicle involved, the date and time of the violation, and the location where the violation occurred; new text end new text begin (3) a copy of the recorded image or primary images used to identify a violation; new text end new text begin (4) a notification that the recorded images under clause (3) are evidence of a violation under subdivision 6; new text end new text begin (5) a statement signed by the parking enforcement agent who issued the citation stating that the agent has inspected the recorded images and determined that the violation occurred with the specified motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (6) a summary of the limitations under subdivision 7; new text end new text begin (7) the total amount of the fine imposed; new text end new text begin (8) a notification that the person has the right to contest the citation; new text end new text begin (9) information on the process and procedures for a person to contest the citation; and new text end new text begin (10) a statement that payment of the fine constitutes a plea of guilty and failure to appear in court is considered a plea of guilty as provided under section 169.91. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Third-party agreements. new text end new text begin (a) A transit operator or local unit of government may enter into agreements with a private entity for operations, services, or equipment under this section. Payment under a contract with a private entity must not be based on the number of violations, citations issued, or other similar means. new text end new text begin (b) A transit operator or local unit of government that enters into a third-party agreement under this subdivision must perform a data practices audit of the private entity to confirm compliance with the requirements under subdivisions 11 to 13 and chapter 13. An audit must be undertaken at least every other year. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Data practices; general requirements. new text end new text begin (a) All data collected by a transit obstruction camera system are private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, or nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9, unless the data are public under section 13.82, subdivision 2, 3, or 6, or are criminal investigative data under section 13.82, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (b) An agreement with a private entity pursuant to subdivision 10 is subject to section 13.05, subdivisions 6 and 11. new text end new text begin (c) A private entity must use the data gathered under this section only for purposes of camera-based parking enforcement and must not share or disseminate the data with an entity other than the appropriate transit provider or local unit of government, except pursuant to a court order. Nothing in this subdivision prevents a private entity from sharing or disseminating summary data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 19. new text end new text begin (d) Transit obstruction camera system data are not subject to subpoena, discovery, or admission into evidence in any prosecution, civil action, or administrative process that is not taken pursuant to this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Data practices; transit obstruction camera system. new text end new text begin A transit obstruction camera system: new text end new text begin (1) is limited to collection of the following data: new text end new text begin (i) recorded video or images of the license plate of a motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (ii) recorded video or images of motor vehicles and areas surrounding the vehicles to the extent necessary to identify a violation under subdivision 6; new text end new text begin (iii) system and infrastructure monitoring data: new text end new text begin (A) collected for purposes of transit system operations analysis, general transit research, or monitoring the condition of transit or bicycle facilities, including but not limited to bus stops and shelters; and new text end new text begin (B) from which an individual or unique vehicle is not identified or ascertainable; and new text end new text begin (iv) date, time, and vehicle location that correlates to the data collected under items (i) to (iii); new text end new text begin (2) must not use biometric identification techniques, including but not limited to facial recognition technology; new text end new text begin (3) must not retain data in a manner that makes any individual personally identifiable, including but not limited to the motor vehicle operator or occupants; and new text end new text begin (4) may only retain the data specified in clause (1), items (i) and (ii), if the transit obstruction camera system identifies a potential violation under subdivision 6 for review. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Data practices; destruction of data. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 138.17, and except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, data collected by a transit obstruction camera system must be destroyed within 30 days of the date of collection unless the data are criminal investigative data under section 13.82, subdivision 7, related to a parking violation. new text end new text begin (b) Upon written request to a local unit of government from an individual who is the subject of a pending criminal charge or complaint, along with the case or complaint number and a statement that the data may be used as exculpatory evidence, data otherwise subject to destruction under paragraph (a) must be preserved by the local unit of government until the charge or complaint is resolved or dismissed. new text end new text begin (c) Upon written request from a program participant under chapter 5B, data collected by a transit obstruction camera system related to the program participant must be destroyed at the time of collection or upon receipt of the request, whichever occurs later, unless the data are active criminal investigative data. The existence of a request submitted under this paragraph is private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding section 138.17, data collected by a transit obstruction camera system must be destroyed within three years of the resolution of a citation issued pursuant to this section. new text end new text begin (e) The destruction requirements under this subdivision do not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) system and infrastructure monitoring data as provided under subdivision 12, clause (1), item (iii); new text end new text begin (2) summary data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 19; and new text end new text begin (3) data that identifies the number of warnings or citations issued to an individual under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment, except that subdivisions 6 and 7 are effective January 1, 2027. Subdivisions 6 and 7 apply to violations committed on or after January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.99, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Form. (a) Except as provided in subdivision 3; section 169.147, subdivision 8;new text begin section 169.355, subdivision 9;new text end and section 169.999, subdivision 3, there shall be a uniform ticket issued throughout the state by the police and peace officers or by any other person for violations of this chapter and ordinances in conformity thereto. Such uniform traffic ticket shall be in the form and have the effect of a summons and complaint. Except as provided in paragraph (b), the uniform ticket shall state that if the defendant fails to appear in court in response to the ticket, an arrest warrant may be issued. The uniform traffic ticket shall consist of four parts, on paper sensitized so that copies may be made without the use of carbon paper, as follows: (1) the complaint, with reverse side for officer's notes for testifying in court, driver's past record, and court's action, printed on white paper; (2) the abstract of court record for the Department of Public Safety, which shall be a copy of the complaint with the certificate of conviction on the reverse side, printed on yellow paper; (3) the police record, which shall be a copy of the complaint and of the reverse side of copy (1), printed on pink paper; and (4) the summons, with, on the reverse side, such information as the court may wish to give concerning the Traffic Violations Bureau, and a plea of guilty and waiver, printed on off-white tag stock. (b) If the offense is a petty misdemeanor, the uniform ticket must state that a failure to appear will be considered a plea of guilty and waiver of the right to trial, unless the failure to appear is due to circumstances beyond the person's control. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TRANSIT OBSTRUCTION CAMERA SYSTEMS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation to implement the transit obstruction camera system requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.355. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end